languages/apertium-nog/tests/voicing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] stems ending in к, contexts where voicing doesn't occur":
    суьек<n><nom> : суьек
    терек<n><nom> : терек
    суьек<n><acc> : суьекти
    терек<n><acc> : теректи
    суьек<n><abl> : суьектен
    терек<n><abl> : теректен

  "[twol] stems ending in к, contexts where voicing does occur":
    суьек<n><px3sp><nom> : суьеги
    терек<n><px3sp><nom> : тереги
    суьек<n><px1sg><nom> : суьегим
    терек<n><px1sg><nom> : терегим

  "[twol] stems ending in п, contexts where voicing doesn't occur":
    китап<n><nom> : китап
    эсап<n><nom> : эсап
    китап<n><acc> : китапти
    эсап<n><acc> : эсапты
    китап<n><abl> : китаптен
    эсап<n><abl> : эсаптан

  "[twol] stems ending in п, contexts where voicing does occur":
    китап<n><px3sp><nom> : китаби
    эсап<n><px3sp><nom> : эсабы
    китап<n><px1sg><acc> : китабимди
    эсап<n><px1sg><acc> : эсабымды

  "[twol] stems ending in Cк, no voicing ever":
    халк<n><nom> : халк
    халк<n><acc> : халкты
    халк<n><px3sp><nom> : халкы
    халк<n><px1pl><nom> : халкымыз

  "[twol] irregular stem ending in к, no voicing ever":
    ак<n><nom> : ак
    ак<n><acc> : акты
    ак<n><px3sp><nom> : акы
    ак<n><px1pl><nom> : акымыз
 
